Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-5-70.
Creation of debts of the state under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall create a debt of the State of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 25; Ga. L. 1988, p. 387, § 1.

47-5-71.
Exemption from levy, attachment, or other process of funds held by the board of trustees or for its account; assignment of benefits or contracts established under this chapter.

Funds held by the board of trustees or for its account shall not be subject to process, levy, or attachment; nor shall benefits arising under this chapter or any contract pursuant to this chapter be assignable.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 421, § 26.

47-5-72.
Exemption of chapter from regulation under Title 33.

Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, the provision of retirement benefits and employee benefits pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to regulation under Title 33.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-5-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1041, § 12; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.